Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2238
Sheriffs; money collected; accounting and payment.

Sheriffs shall pay over to the party entitled thereto all money received in his or her official capacity if demand is made by such party, or such party's agent or attorney, at any time before he or she returns the writ upon which he or she has received it. If not paid over by that time, the sheriff shall pay the same to the clerk of the county court when he or she returns the writ.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 179, p. 325;

C.S.1929, § 22-1509;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,180;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,180;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 43;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-5,103;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 20.